Virginia statutes. Title 12.1. State Corporation Commission.
Chapter 3. Powers and Duties of the Commission.

§ 12.1-12.
Powers and duties generally.

Subject to such requirements as may be prescribed by law, the Commission shall be the department of government through which shall be issued all charters, and amendments or extensions thereof, of domestic corporations and all licenses of foreign corporations to do business in this Commonwealth. Except as may be otherwise prescribed by law, the Commission shall be charged with the duty of administering the laws made for the regulation and control of corporations doing business in this Commonwealth. Subject to such criteria and other requirements as may be prescribed by law, the Commission shall have the power and be charged with the duty of regulating the rates, charges, services, and facilities of all public service companies as defined in § 56-1. The Commission shall in proceedings before it insure that the interests of the consumers of the Commonwealth are represented, unless the General Assembly otherwise provides for representation of such interests. The Commission may appoint such clerical force as may be deemed necessary to the efficiency of its office, but the aggregate amount paid such clerks shall not exceed the sum provided by law; and it may expend for the contingent expenses of its office such sums as may be provided by law. The Commission shall have such other powers and duties as may be prescribed by law.

Upon request, the Commission may require any business (i) to disclose whether it is an out-of-state business as defined in subsection A of § 44-146.28:2 and (ii) if the business states that it is such, to provide a statement that includes the business’s name, state of domicile, principal business address, federal tax identification number, date of entry into the Commonwealth, local contact information, and contact information for any affiliate of such business that has obtained from the Commission a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth.
B. 1. Upon request, the Commission may require any business (i) to disclose whether it is an out-of-state business as defined in subsection A of § 44-146.28:2 and (ii) if the business states that it is such, to provide a statement that includes the business’s name, state of domicile, principal business address, federal tax identification number, date of entry into the Commonwealth, local contact information, and contact information for any affiliate of such business that has obtained from the Commission a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth.

Upon request, the Commission may require any business entity that has obtained from the Commission a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth to provide the information required in clause (ii) of subdivision 1 for any affiliate that is an out-of-state business as defined in subsection A of § 44-146.28:2.

The Commission shall maintain a record of such disclosures, statements, and information and shall make the record available to the public.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 12-14, 14-11, 14-25; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-13; 1970, c. 260; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1998, c. 872; 2015, c. 595.

Cross references.

For constitutional provisions relating to powers and duties of the Commission, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 2.

As to authority of Commission relative to industrialized building units and mobile homes, see §§

36-70

through

36-85.1

.

As to supervision and control of Uninsured Motorists Fund, see §

38.2-3000

et seq.

As to complaints pertaining to construction of electrical transmission lines, see § 56-46.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 311, cl. 1, as amended by Acts 2018, c. 253, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That from July 1, 2014, until the State Corporation Commission (Commission) has implemented a system that limits the submission of data and documents as required by § 2 of this act, the Commission shall not accept through its eFile electronic registration system (i) articles of dissolution of a business entity or (ii) data or documents that contain officer or director changes.

“§ 2. Beginning not later than January 1, 2020, the Commission shall limit the submission of data and documents on behalf of a business entity through its electronic registration system to any user (i) designated to make such submissions on behalf of the business entity and (ii) whose identity has been established satisfactorily through a verification process.”

Acts 2016, cc. 255 and 517, cl. 1 provide: “That the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall evaluate the establishment of uniform protocols for measuring, verifying, validating, and reporting the impacts of energy efficiency measures implemented by investor-owned electric utilities providing retail electric utility service in the Commonwealth and the establishment of a methodology for estimating annual kilowatt savings and a formula to calculate the levelized cost of saved energy for such energy efficiency measures. The Commission shall promptly commence such evaluation following the effective date of this act and shall receive input from interested parties and the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy. The Commission shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a report of its findings and recommendations by December 1, 2016.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 13 provides: “That each Phase I Utility and each Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall investigate the feasibility of providing broadband Internet services using utility distribution and transmission infrastructure. Such investigation shall include determination of regulatory barriers to such services and proposed legislation to address such barriers. The State Corporation Commission shall assist each such utility in its determination of such barriers and development of proposed legislation. Each such utility shall evaluate whether it is in the public interest and the interest of the utility (i) to make improvements to the distribution grid in furtherance of providing such broadband Internet services in conjunction with its program of electric distribution grid transformation projects; (ii) to operate broadband Internet services using utility distribution and transmission infrastructure to provide broadband Internet services to unserved areas of the Commonwealth; or (iii) to permit a commercial entity to lease such capacity to provide broadband Internet services to unserved areas of the Commonwealth. Each such utility shall report whether it determines such broadband Internet services using utility distribution and transmission infrastructure to be feasible, including the maturity of the technology, the compatibility of such services with existing electric services, the financial requirements to undertake such broadband Internet services, and those unserved areas in the Commonwealth where the provision of such broadband Internet services appears feasible, to the Governor, the State Corporation Commission, the Broadband Advisory Council, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor by December 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 21 provides: “That on or before July 1, 2028, subject to the approval of the State Corporation Commission (the Commission), a Phase I Utility, as that term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall construct or acquire a generation facility or facilities utilizing energy derived from sunlight with an aggregate capacity of not less than 200 megawatts located in the Commonwealth, which utility-owned generation facility or facilities is in the public interest as is set forth in this act. If a Phase I Utility serves in more than one jurisdiction, and a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth denies the Phase I Utility recovery of the costs of the generation facility or facilities utilizing energy from sunlight allocated to that jurisdiction, the Phase I Utility can recover all of the costs of the generation facility or facilities utilizing energy from sunlight from its Virginia jurisdictional customers, and all attributes of the generation facility or facilities utilizing energy from sunlight, including energy and capacity shall be assigned to Virginia.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 23 provides: “That within 60 days after the conclusion of each triennial review proceeding conducted pursuant to § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Commerce and Labor Committees describing and quantifying all investments made by the utility during the test period or periods under review in both (i) new utility-owned generation facilities utilizing energy derived from sunlight or from onshore or offshore wind and (ii) electric distribution grid transformation projects, as determined by the utility’s plant in service and construction work in progress balances related to such investments as recorded per books by the utility for financial reporting purposes as of the end of the most recent test period under review. The Commission’s report shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of the financial effects of such investments, including the effects on customer rates, customer bill credits, and the earnings and rate base of each utility subject to the triennial review provisions of § 56-585.1.”

Acts 2019, c. 399, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That by September 1, 2019, the State Corporation Commission (Commission) shall convene and facilitate a Data Access Stakeholder group to review and consider the following subjects:

“1. Customer privacy considerations, including the establishment of the definitions for, and the protection of, personally identifiable information and energy usage data resulting from the deployment of advanced metering infrastructure by the electric utility;

“2. The impact of data sharing on the physical and cybersecurity of utility infrastructure and systems;

“3. Aggregating anonymized energy usage data;

“4. The format for data access that is customer-friendly and computer-friendly;

“5. Ensuring that standards and practices for access to data adhere to nationally recognized standards and best practices;

“6. Opt-in/opt-out conditions for access to customers’ utility usage data by the electric utility, a contracted agent, and a third party;

“7. Current data access and sharing provisions resulting from the deployment of advanced metering infrastructure implemented by other utilities in the Commonwealth;

“8. Costs of and cost recovery mechanisms for changes to electric utility infrastructure needed to implement regulations; and

“9. Notice requirements by utilities to customers regarding the types of energy usage data being collected, how that data is used by the utility to provide the utility service, how customers can access their data, how the customer can manage and direct what specific information from their energy usage data can be shared, with whom this data can be shared outside the utility, and when the data can be shared.

“The Data Access Stakeholder group shall conclude its work no later than April 1, 2020, and the Commission shall report the recommendations of the Data Access Stakeholder group to the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 512, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The State Corporation Commission’s Bureau of Insurance (the Bureau) shall make recommendations regarding any necessary statutory changes that would permit the sale of private insurance plans that would help meet the policy goals identified in the ‘Paid Family and Medical Leave Study’ published by the Offices of the Secretary of Commerce and Trade and the Chief Workforce Development Advisor in September 2020 and coexist as part of a statewide paid family and medical leave program, administered by the Commonwealth, as outlined in such study. In conducting its review, the Bureau shall convene a stakeholder group to participate in the process, which shall include representatives from the insurance industry, the business community, including small and mid-size businesses that have had difficulty purchasing private insurance in the past, labor organizations, advocates for paid family leave and medical leave, and other interested parties. The Bureau shall report its findings and recommendations to the Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor and Finance and Appropriations and the House Committees on Labor and Commerce and Appropriations by November 30, 2021.”

The 1998 amendment,

effective October 1, 1998, added the present fifth sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 595, effective March 26, 2015, inserted the A designation and added subsection B.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia municipal corporations and administrative law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1971).

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For survey of Virginia property law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1583 (1974).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 2, 17, 23; 15 M.J. Railroads, § 41.

§ 12.1-13.
Commission to have powers of court of record; rules and regulations; fines.

In all matters within the jurisdiction of the Commission, it shall have the powers of a court of record to administer oaths, to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, to punish for contempt, and to enforce compliance with its lawful orders or requirements by adjudging and enforcing by its own appropriate process such fines or other penalties as may be prescribed or authorized by law.

In the administration and enforcement of all laws within its jurisdiction, the Commission shall have the power to promulgate rules and regulations, to impose and collect such fines or other penalties as are provided by law, to enter appropriate orders, and to issue temporary and permanent injunctions. The Commission is empowered to suspend or revoke any Commission-issued license, certificate, registration, permit, or any other Commission-issued authority of any person who fails to satisfy any fine or penalty imposed by an order of the Commission.

Whenever no fine or other penalty is specifically imposed by statute for the failure of any such individual or business conducted by any entity other than an individual to comply with any provision of law or with any valid rule, regulation, or order of the Commission, the Commission may impose and collect from such individual or business conducted by any entity other than an individual a fine in an amount not to exceed $5,000 in the case of an individual, and in the case of a business conducted by any entity other than an individual not to exceed $10,000.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1992, c. 11; 2000, c. 986.

Cross references.

As to penalties and liabilities of real estate settlement agents, see §

55.1-1015

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 986, in the last paragraph, substituted “individual or business conducted by any entity other than an individual” for “person” twice, and substituted “$5,000” for “$500,” “business conducted by any entity other than an individual” for “corporation” and “$10,000” for “$5,000.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 31.

§ 12.1-14.
Commission’s power to impose penalties does not relieve from other penalties.

The penalties which the Commission is authorized by law to impose on any person shall not be construed to relieve such person from any other penalties which may be authorized by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-19; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.

§ 12.1-15.
Power to compromise and settle; power to waive penalties and charge off delinquent taxes, etc.

The Commission shall have power and authority in any matter, claim, or charge within its jurisdiction, under any provision of law heretofore or hereafter enacted, to compromise or settle any matter, claim, or charge, either by or in a formal proceeding, or informally, whether any proceeding shall have been instituted or not.
The Commission shall have the power and authority to dismiss any proceeding which is pending and in which a compromise or settlement is effected without making a formal record of such compromise or settlement, in its sound judicial discretion.
Any compromise or settlement may include provisions for reimbursement to the Commission to defray the costs, or a portion thereof, of any audit, investigation, or examination conducted.

The power and authority of the Commission to make compromises and settlements hereby conferred shall extend to its jurisdiction to impose fines and penalties under any provision of law heretofore or hereafter enacted.

Nothing herein contained, however, shall be construed to authorize or empower the Commission to effect any compromise or settlement involving the payment of money into the treasury without some record or memorandum of such compromise or settlement in the clerk’s office of the Commission.

The Commission shall have power and authority to waive the assessment of any penalty or interest upon any tax or fee assessed by the Commission, and to abate and exonerate any such penalty or interest, whether heretofore or hereafter assessed, for providential or other good cause shown to the satisfaction of the Commission, or in cases where the collection thereof cannot be economically effected because the cost of collection exceeds the amount recoverable.

The Commission shall have power and authority to charge off delinquent taxes and registration fees on its books when the claims therefor are worthless or cannot be economically collected, and shall notify the State Tax Commissioner and the Comptroller of such action in such detail and at such times as they may require.
The Commission shall maintain records which indicate the reason for the charge off for a period of three years.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-20; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1975, c. 236; 1991, c. 128.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1632 (1975).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 18; 18 M.J. Taxation, § 27.

§ 12.1-15.1.
Power to employ counsel for and indemnify employees.

The Commission shall have the power to retain counsel for and to indemnify its employees and agents who were or are parties or are threatened to be made parties to any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding whether civil, criminal, administrative, arbitrative or investigative, by reason of the fact that they are or were employees or agents of the Commission or are or were serving at the request of the Commission as directors, officers, employees or agents of another entity, against expenses, including attorney’s fees, reasonably incurred by them in connection with such action, suit or proceeding if the Commission or any court of record to whom the matter shall be submitted shall find the employees or agents acting in good faith and in a manner they reasonably believe to be in the best interest of the duties assigned to them by law or the Commission.

History.

1976, c. 341.

§ 12.1-16.
Delegation to employees and agents; Commissioner of Financial Institutions and Commissioner of Insurance.

In the exercise of the powers and in the performance of the duties imposed by law upon the Commission with respect to insurance and banking, the Commission may delegate to such employees and agents as it may deem proper such powers and require of them, or any of them, the performance of such duties as it may deem proper. The employee or agent who is placed by the Commission at the head of the bureau or division through which it administers the banking laws shall be designated “Commissioner of Financial Institutions,” and the employee or agent who is placed by the Commission at the head of the bureau or division through which it administers the insurance laws shall be designated “Commissioner of Insurance,” and they and all deputies, agents, and employees used in such bureau or division shall be appointed by the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-16; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1978, c. 14.

Law Review.

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insurance, § 2; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 2.

§ 12.1-17.
Deposits of funds; means of payment; dishonored payments; receipts for payment.

All funds received by the Commission in the course of its duties shall be paid promptly to the State Treasurer or deposited promptly in banks designated by the State Treasurer to the credit of the State Treasurer.

The Commission may accept payment of any amount due by any means acceptable to the Commission, including by check, credit card, debit card, and electronic funds transfer. The Commission may add to any amount due a sum, not to exceed the amount charged to the Commission, for acceptance of any payment by a means that incurs a charge to the Commission, or it may absorb a portion or all of the cost of such charge.

If any check or other means of payment is dishonored, declined, refused, reversed, charged back to the Commission, returned to the Commission unpaid, or otherwise rejected for any reason by a financial institution or other third party, the amount of the check or other means of payment shall be charged to the person on whose account it was received and his liability and that of his sureties shall be as if payment had never been made. A penalty of $35 or the amount of any cost incurred by the Commission, whichever is greater, shall be added to such amount. This penalty shall be in addition to any other penalty provided by law, except the penalty imposed by §

58.1-12

shall not apply. Any penalties received by the Commission under this section shall be set aside and paid into the special fund (i) created under §

13.1-775.1

, in the case of penalties received by the clerk’s office, or (ii) into which the payment that caused the penalty was to be deposited, in the case of penalties otherwise received by the Commission.

The Commission shall issue receipts for all currency received for payments in the course of its duties.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 12-24, 12-25; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1986, c. 15; 1995, c. 238; 2002, c. 719; 2013, c. 21; 2017, c. 486.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 719 deleted “payment by bad check;” in the section catchline; combined former subsections A and B as present subsection A, and rewrote that subsection; and redesignated former subsection C as present subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 21 designated the former second paragraph of subsection A as subsection C and rewrote it, added subsection B, and redesignated former subsection B as subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 486 added “or it may absorb a portion or all of the cost of such charge” in the last sentence of subsection B.